Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 87 Rhode Island Prekindergarten Education Act

16-87-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Prekindergarten Education Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 265, § 1.

16-87-2.
Findings.

The general assembly hereby finds that attending high quality early childhood education programs help children develop important social and cognitive skills and knowledge that prepares children to succeed in school. Research has shown long-lasting benefits for children who participate in very high quality, educationally focused early childhood programs. The benefits to children can also generate substantial government cost savings, including reduced need for special education services, reduced need for cash assistance and other public benefits, and reduced rates of incarceration.

The general assembly finds that there are substantial numbers of children in Rhode Island entering kindergarten who are not adequately prepared to succeed in school. Early school failure may ultimately contribute to such children dropping out of school at an early age, failing to achieve their full potential, becoming dependent upon public assistance, or becoming involved in criminal activities.

Furthermore, the general assembly finds that there is an existing infrastructure of early childhood programs in Rhode Island serving preschool age children in full-day and half-day programs that is supported through state and federal investments in child care, Head Start and special education. It is the goal of the general assembly to support a system of publicly-funded, high quality prekindergarten education programs that are operated through a diverse delivery network, including child care, Head Start and public school districts.

By enacting this law, the general assembly acknowledges the need to adequately prepare all children to succeed in school by providing access to publicly-funded high quality prekindergarten education programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 265, § 1.

16-87-3.
Planning phase for a prekindergarten program.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall begin planning an initial, pilot prekindergarten program that meets high quality standards, builds on the existing early childhood education infrastructure in the state (including child care, Head Start and public schools) and serves children ages three (3) and four (4) who reside in communities with concentrations of low performing schools. This planning phase will develop specific goals to expand the pilot prekindergarten program over time and will also identify opportunities to strengthen care and learning programs for infants and toddlers.

During this planning phase, the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education will quantify the resources needed to achieve and maintain high quality standards in prekindergarten programs and identify incentives and supports to develop a qualified early education workforce, including opportunities for experienced early childhood educators and paraprofessionals to acquire college degrees and earn early childhood teacher certification.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education will begin to develop plans to collect and analyze data regarding the impact of the pilot prekindergarten program on participating children’s school readiness and school achievement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 265, § 1.

16-87-4.
Early childhood workforce development.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall work with other state departments and private philanthropy to establish a statewide, comprehensive, research-based early childhood workforce development scholarship program to expand the number of early childhood educators who have an associate’s or bachelor’s degree in early childhood education and who work with children from birth to age five (5).

In furtherance of the goals set forth in this chapter, no later than January 1, 2023, the governor’s workforce board shall convene a working group comprised of representatives from the department of elementary and secondary education, department of human services, office of the postsecondary commissioner, the RI early learning council, organized labor, and early childhood education industry employers, whose purpose shall be to identify barriers to entry into the early childhood education workforce, and to design accessible and accelerated pathways into the workforce, including, but not limited to, registered apprenticeships and postsecondary credit for prior work experience.

No later than April 1, 2023, the working group shall provide the general assembly with recommendations for addressing the barriers to workforce entry and implementing the solutions identified by the working group; the recommendations shall outline any administrative and legislative action that would be required by participating agencies to implement the recommendations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 10, § 3, effective June 27, 2022.

16-87-5.
Reporting.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall report back to the general assembly and the governor on the progress of the pilot planning phase no later than October 31, 2008.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 265, § 1.

16-87-6.
Planning for prekindergarten expansion.

On or before December 31, 2022, the department of elementary and secondary education, in collaboration with the department of human services and the children’s cabinet, as established in §

42-72.5-1

, shall submit to the governor, speaker of the house, president of the senate, and chairs of the house and senate finance and education committees, an annual growth plan to expand the state prekindergarten program to five thousand (5,000) seats, for three- and four-year-old children, over five (5) years, beginning in FY 2024, as well as recommendations for achieving universal prekindergarten in the state. The growth plan shall detail annual targets and projected funding needs, as well as how the state will:

Equitably distribute prekindergarten funding to eligible providers;

Ensure that access to infant and toddler care is not at risk as the state prekindergarten program is expanded;

Prepare, recruit, and retain a highly-qualified early childhood workforce, including adequate wages for early childhood educators, regardless of setting;

Build capacity among new and existing providers to ensure quality standards are met in all settings; and

Ensure providers in the mixed-delivery system have sufficient facilities to expand access to high-quality prekindergarten services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 10, § 4, effective June 27, 2022.

16-87-7.
Prekindergarten facilities.

No later than December 31, 2022, the department of human services shall provide the speaker of the house and president of the senate with a report on the status of disbursement and impact of capital funds made available by the early learning facilities general obligation bond approved on March 2, 2021.

The departments of elementary and secondary education and human services may also provide recommendations for programs and initiatives to ensure that early childhood education providers utilize facilities that meet licensing and facilities standards, in order to increase access to high-quality prekindergarten learning environments. Programs and initiatives may include, but shall not be limited to:

Grant programs for facility planning and/or emergency facility maintenance;

Establishing strategic partnerships between local education agencies and community-based early learning providers to make use of available space in existing facilities; and/or

Technical assistance for providers to access capital, navigate licensing standards for facilities, and/or begin the facility improvement and development processes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 10, § 4, effective June 27, 2022.